Connecticut, session 2026, HB05168.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Designated employee" means a school nurse or nurse practitioner
appointed pursuant to section 10-212 of the general statutes, school
nurse supervisor, school counselor, school social worker or school
psychologist who a local or regional school board of education
designates to access safety plans of minor patients transmitted by health
care providers to a school district or school's secure messaging system
account pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) "Health care provider" means any person, corporation, limited
liability company, facility or institution operated, owned or licensed by
this state to provide health care or professional medical services;
(3) "Legally authorized representative" means a minor patient's
parent, guardian appointed by the Probate Court or a personal
representative, as described in 45 CFR 164.502(g);
(4) "Safety plan" means a written document created collaboratively
between a health care provider and a patient outlining coping strategies,
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5168
activities and support networks the patient can access to prevent or
manage a potential mental health crisis;
(5) "School nurse supervisor" means a school nurse or nurse
practitioner appointed pursuant to section 10-212 of the general statutes
designated by the local or regional board of education as the supervisor,
or, if no designation has been made by the board, the lead or
coordinating school nurse or nurse practitioner; and
(6) "Secure messaging system" means a platform capable of sending
and receiving secure messages and may include a platform that
complies with the Direct Project specifications published by the federal
Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology.
(b) On and after April 1, 2027, each health care provider that prepares
a safety plan for a minor patient who received inpatient behavioral
health care treatment for a period not less than twelve consecutive days
shall (1) review such safety plan with the minor patient if the health care
provider believes such a review is medically appropriate, and (2)
inquire as to whether the minor patient or minor patient's parent or
legally authorized representative consents to sharing such safety plan
with the minor patient's school. If the minor patient or minor patient's
parent or legally authorized representative consents to sharing such
safety plan with the minor patient's school, the health care provider
shall obtain written consent from (A) the minor patient's parent or
legally authorized representative, or (B) if the minor patient is sixteen
years of age or older, such minor patient, and transmit such safety plan
to the minor patient's school district or school (i) using a secure
messaging system, or (ii) in a form and manner that complies with the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-
191, as amended from time to time, and 45 CFR 160.101 to 45 CFR
164.534, inclusive, as amended from time to time.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) create a standard
of medical care with respect to any minor patient, (2) require a health
care provider to create a safety plan, (3) require a health care provider
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5168
to release information to a parent or legally authorized representative if,
pursuant to state or federal law, a minor patient may withhold such
information from such minor patient's parent or legally authorized
representative, including, but not limited to, information regarding
pregnancy, abortion, contraceptives, human immunodeficiency virus or
other sexually transmitted disease testing or treatment, mental health
treatment or any other area of care that a health care provider has
promised a minor patient that the health care provider will keep
confidential, or (4) require a health care provider to transmit a safety
plan or provide any other information to any person in violation of the
provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply unless the State-wide
Health Information Exchange provides, pursuant to section 17b-59d of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, a secure messaging system
organizational account to each school district or school, as determined
by each local and regional board of education, for the purposes of
receiving minor patient safety plans pursuant to the provisions of this
section, and access to such organizational account for designated
employees at no cost to such school district, school and designated
employee.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) On or before January 1, 2027,
each local or regional board of education shall ensure that each school
district or school, as determined by the board, (1) signs up for an
organizational account on a secure messaging system, as defined in
section 1 of this act, and (2) provides access to one or more designated
employees, as defined in section 1 of this act, one of whom shall be a
school nurse supervisor, as defined in section 1 of this act, to such
organizational account for the purpose of accessing minor patient safety
plans, as defined in section 1 of this act, transmitted by health care
providers, pursuant to the provisions of section 1 of this act. A
designated employee shall retain minor patient safety plans in a
confidential file separate from any cumulative academic or health
record, provided information contained in a minor patient safety plan
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5168
may be used to provide appropriate interventions pursuant to an
individualized education program or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.
(b) On or before April 1, 2027, each local or regional board of
education shall submit each school district or school's secure messaging
system address to the Commissioner of Education in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner. On and after April 1, 2027, if a school
district or school's secure messaging system address changes, each local
or regional board of education shall, in a form and manner prescribed
by the commissioner, submit such new address to the commissioner as
soon as practicable but not later than thirty days after acquiring such
new address. The commissioner shall compile and maintain a list of each
school district or school's secure messaging system address and make
such list available to health care providers in the state for the purpose of
transmitting minor patient safety plans pursuant to the provisions of
section 1 of this act.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply unless the State-wide
100 Health Information Exchange provides, pursuant to section 17b-59d of
101 the general statutes, as amended by this act, a secure messaging system
102 organizational account to each school district or school, as determined
103 by each local and regional board of education, for the purposes of
104 receiving minor patient safety plans pursuant to the provisions of
105 section 1 of this act, and access to such organizational account for
106 designated employees at no cost to such school district, school and
107 designated employee.
108 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) For the school year
109 commencing July 1, 2027, and each school year thereafter, each local and
110 regional board of education shall provide guidance regarding the
111 requirements of section 1 of this act for all new designated employees,
112 as defined in section 1 of this act. The Department of Education shall
113 develop and make available such guidance and training materials for
114 use by each local and regional board of education. Such materials shall
115 include instruction for using a secure messaging system for the purpose
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5168
116 of accessing minor patient safety plans, as defined in section 1 of this
117 act, transmitted by health care providers pursuant to the provisions of
118 section 1 of this act.
119 (b) The provisions of this section shall not apply unless the State-wide
120 Health Information Exchange provides, pursuant to section 17b-59d of
121 the general statutes, as amended by this act, a secure messaging system
122 organizational account to each school district or school, as determined
123 by each local and regional board of education, for the purposes of
124 receiving minor patient safety plans pursuant to the provisions of
125 section 1 of this act, and access to such organizational account for
126 designated employees at no cost to such school district, school and
127 designated employee.
128 Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 17b-59d of the general statutes is
129 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
130 passage):
131 (b) It shall be the goal of the State-wide Health Information Exchange
132 to: (1) Allow real-time, secure access to patient health information and
133 complete medical records across all health care provider settings; (2)
134 provide patients with secure electronic access to their health
135 information in accordance with 45 CFR 171; (3) allow voluntary
136 participation by patients to access their health information at no cost; (4)
137 support care coordination through real-time alerts and timely access to
138 clinical information; (5) reduce costs associated with preventable
139 readmissions, duplicative testing and medical errors; (6) promote the
140 highest level of interoperability; (7) meet all state and federal privacy
141 and security requirements; (8) support public health reporting, quality
142 improvement, academic research and health care delivery and payment
143 reform through data aggregation and analytics; (9) support population
144 health analytics; (10) be standards-based; [and] (11) provide for broad
145 local governance that (A) includes stakeholders, including, but not
146 limited to, representatives of the Department of Social Services,
147 hospitals, physicians, behavioral health care providers, long-term care
148 providers, health insurers, employers, patients and academic or medical
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5168
149 research institutions, and (B) is committed to the successful
150 development and implementation of the State-wide Health Information
151 Exchange; and (12) provide, within available appropriations, (A) a
152 secure messaging system organizational account to each school district
153 or school, as determined by each local and regional board of education,
154 for the purposes of receiving minor patient safety plans pursuant to the
155 provisions of section 1 of this act, and (B) access to such organizational
156 account for designated employees, as defined in section 1 of this act, at
157 no cost to such school district, school and designated employee.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 4 from passage 17b-59d(b)
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6